Montana, session 2025, HB657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Municipal review of public water and sewer construction. (1) If a city
or town employs or contracts with a licensed professional engineer and the appropriate division of the city or
town has established review programs, the city or town is authorized to review and approve the design and
construction of:
(a) public water and sewer systems; and
(b) extensions or alterations of existing public water and sewer systems.
(2) A city or town conducting a review under this section shall complete documents necessary to
complete the review and to comply with:
(a) the Montana Environmental Policy Act provided for in Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 through 3;
(b) real property takings requirements in accordance with Title 70; and
(c) determinations of nondegradation and nonsignificance as required in Title 75, chapter 5.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 75, chapter 6, part 1, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 6, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 657